Massachusetts, session 194th, H924.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 335 of the acts of 1905 is hereby amended by striking out section 4
and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 4. The Great Barrington Fire District may supply any of the inhabitants of the
town of Great Barrington with water for domestic and other purposes, upon such terms as the fire
district may determine.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1